Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 8. HEALTH INSURANCE AND OTHER HEALTH COVERAGES

SUBTITLE E. BENEFITS PAYABLE UNDER HEALTH COVERAGES

CHAPTER 1359. FORMULAS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH PHENYLKETONURIA OR OTHER HERITABLE DISEASES

Sec. 1359.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Heritable disease" means an inherited disease that may result in a physical or intellectual disability or death.

(2) "Phenylketonuria" means an inherited condition that, if not treated, may cause a severe intellectual disability.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 30 (H.B. 446), Sec. 8.07, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1359.002. APPLICABILITY OF CHAPTER. This chapter applies only to a group health benefit plan that is a group policy, contract, or certificate of health insurance or an evidence of coverage delivered, issued for delivery, or renewed in this state by:

(1) an insurance company;

(2) a group hospital service corporation operating under Chapter 842; or

(3) a health maintenance organization operating under Chapter 843.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.

Sec. 1359.003. COVERAGE REQUIRED. (a) A group health benefit plan must provide coverage for formulas necessary to treat phenylketonuria or a heritable disease.

(b) The group health benefit plan must provide the coverage to the same extent that the plan provides coverage for drugs that are available only on the orders of a physician.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1274, Sec. 3, eff. April 1, 2005.